Utah statutes.
75-2-403.   Exempt property.

In addition to the homestead allowance, the decedent's surviving spouse is entitled from the estate to a value, not exceeding $15,000 in excess of any security interests therein, in household furniture, automobiles, furnishings, appliances, and personal effects.  If there is no surviving spouse, the decedent's children are entitled jointly to the same value.  If encumbered chattels are selected and the value in excess of security interests, plus that of other exempt property, is less than $15,000, or if there is not $15,000 worth of exempt property in the estate, the spouse or children are entitled to other assets of the estate, if any, to the extent necessary to make up the $15,000 value.  Rights to exempt property and assets needed to make up a deficiency of exempt property have priority over all claims against the estate, but the right to any assets to make up a deficiency of exempt property abates as necessary to permit earlier payment of homestead allowance and family allowance.  Unless otherwise provided by the will or governing instrument, the exempt property allowance is chargeable against any benefit or share passing to the surviving spouse, if any, or if there is no surviving spouse, to the decedent's children, by the will of the decedent, by intestate succession, by way of elective share, and by way of nonprobate transfers as defined in Sections 75-2-205 and 75-2-206.



Amended by Chapter 93, 2010 General Session

